Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1210.   Contract provisions for incentives, damages, and penalties.

A procurement unit may include in a contract terms that provide for:

(1)  incentives, including bonuses;

(2)  payment of damages, including liquidated damages; or

(3)  penalties.



Enacted by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

